Alabama, session 2026rs, HB172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
23 Section 1. Sections 20-1-20 and 20-1-25, Code of
24 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
25 "§20-1-20
26 When used in this chapter, the following words and
27 phrasesterms shall have the following meanings, respectively,
28 unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
Page 1

unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
HB172 INTRODUCED
29 (1) ARTICLE. When referring to food or drugs, suchthe
30 term is used in the broad and comprehensive sense and has
31 reference to the food product or the drug product in question.
32 (2) ARTIFICIAL INGREDIENT. An ingredient that is
33 synthetically created or modified by humans.
34 (2)(3) BABY FOOD. A food whichthat purports to be or is
35 represented for special dietary use as a food for babies by
36 reason of its special formulation or its particular
37 suitability for children under two years of age.
38 (3)(4) BOARD. The State Board of Agriculture and
39 Industries.
40 (4)(5) CLASS A FOODS. Baby food, infant formula, and
41 potentially hazardous food.
42 (5)(6) COMMISSIONER. The Commissioner of Agriculture
43 and Industries.
44 (6)(7) DEALER. A manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer,
45 jobber, and similar establishments, mobile or permanent,
46 engaged in the sale of food for consumption on premises.
47 (7)(8) DEPARTMENT. The Department of Agriculture and
48 Industries.
49 (8)(9) DRUG. All medicines and preparations recognized
50 in the United States pharmacopoeia or national formulary for
51 internal or external use and any substance or mixture of
52 substances to be used for the cure, mitigation, or prevention
53 of disease in manhumans or domestic animals.
54 (9)(10) FOOD. All articles of food, drink,
55 confectionery, or condiment, whether simple, mixed, or
56 compound, used or intended for use by manhumans or domestic
Page 2

compound, used or intended for use by manhumans or domestic
HB172 INTRODUCED
57 animals.
58 (10)(11) FOOD SALES ESTABLISHMENT. Retail and wholesale
59 stores and places of business, and similar establishments,
60 mobile or permanent, engaged in the sale of food primarily for
61 consumption off the premisesoff-premises.
62 (11)(12) INFANT FORMULA. A food which purports to be or
63 is represented for special dietary use solely as a food for
64 infants by reason of its simulation of human milk or its
65 suitability as a complete or partial substitute for human
66 milk.
67 (13) INGREDIENT. Any single chemical entity or mixture
68 used as a component in the manufacture of a food or drug
69 article.
70 (12)(14) LABEL. A display of written, printed, or
71 graphic matter upon the immediate container of any article.
72 (13)(15) MISBRANDED. Such term shall apply to all drugs
73 or foods or articles which enter into the composition of food,
74 theThe package or label of whichany drug, food, article, or
75 ingredient shall bear or containthat bears or contains any
76 statement, design, or device regarding suchthe article or the
77 ingredients or substances contained therein which shall bethat
78 is false or misleading in any particular and to any food or
79 drug product which is falsely brandedway, including as to the
80 state, territory, or country in which it is manufactured or
81 produced.
82 (16) NATURAL INGREDIENT. A food or drug ingredient that
83 does not include any synthetic or artificial chemicals that
84 would not normally be expected in that food or drug
Page 3

would not normally be expected in that food or drug
HB172 INTRODUCED
85 ingredient.
86 (14)(17) OPEN-DATE STATEMENT. The terms "Sell By";
87 "Freeze By"; "Sell or Freeze By"; "Not to be Sold After";
88 "Best if Used By"; "Expiration"; or other terms as defined by
89 rules or regulationsrule; or a date without additional words
90 shall be considered an open-date statement.
91 (15)(18) OUT-OF-DATE. Any article with a label
92 containing an open-date statement with a date affixed thereto
93 whichthat has passed.
94 (16)(19) PERSON. An individual, partnership,
95 corporation, or association, or any combination thereof.
96 (17)(20) POTENTIALLY HAZARDOUS FOOD. A food that is
97 natural or synthetic and that requires temperature control
98 because it is in a form capable of supporting rapid and
99 progressive growth of infectious or toxigenic microorganisms,
100 or the growth and toxin production of Clostridium botulinum,
101 or the growth of Salmonella Enteritidis. The term does not
102 include foods whichthat have a pH level 1 of 4.6 or below; or,
103 a water activity (a sub w) of 0.85 or less;, or food products
104 in hermetically sealed containers processed to achieve and
105 maintain commercial sterility under unrefrigerated conditions.
106 The foregoing notwithstanding, the board may by rule adopt the
107 definition for "Potentially Hazardous Food" set out in
108 subparagraph 1-201.10 (B)(61), Food Code, 1999 Recommendations
109 of the United States Public Health Service, Food and Drug
110 Administration, National Technical Information Service
111 Publication, PB99-115929.
112 (18)(21) STANDARD OF PURITY OR QUALITY. The standards
Page 4

(18)(21) STANDARD OF PURITY OR QUALITY. The standards
HB172 INTRODUCED
113 of purity for food products promulgatedadopted by the State
114 Board of Agriculture and Industries and by statutes of this
115 state."
116 "§20-1-25
117 An article of food shall be deemed misbranded in all of
118 the following cases:
119 (1) If it is offered for sale under the name of another
120 article;.
121 (2) If it is labeled or branded so as to deceive or
122 mislead the purchaser, or purports to be a foreign product
123 when not soit is not, or if the contents of the package as
124 originally put up shall have been removed in whole or in part
125 and other contents shall have been placed in suchthe package;.
126 (3) If, in package form, the name of the article,
127 together with the quantity of the contents in terms of weight,
128 measure, or numerical count, and the name and principal
129 address of the manufacturer or other person responsible for
130 placing the article on the market are not plainly and
131 conspicuously marked on the outside of the package;.
132 (4) If, in package form, the package is not filled with
133 the food it purports to contain within the limits of tolerance
134 fixed by the State Board of Agriculture and Industries,
135 irrespective of whether the quantity of the contents is
136 plainly and conspicuously marked on the outside of the package
137 in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count;.
138 (5) If the package containing it or its label shall
139 bearbears any statement, design, or device regarding the
140 ingredients or the substances contained therein, whichand the
Page 5

ingredients or the substances contained therein, whichand the
HB172 INTRODUCED
141 statement, design, or device shall beis false or misleading in
142 any particular;.
143 (6) If, in bulk, it is colored so as to deceive or
144 mislead the purchaser;.
145 (7) If it is offered for sale under false
146 representations;.
147 (8) If it is an imitation of another article and is not
148 marked with the word "imitation," followed, without
149 intervening descriptive matter, by a list of the ingredients
150 contained therein;.
151 (9) If it is a compound for which no standard of purity
152 or quality has been established, and it is not labeled with
153 the word "compound," followed, without intervening descriptive
154 matter, by a list of the ingredients; provided,. that in the
155 case of An article shall not be deemed misbranded if it is a
156 compound which may be now or from time to time hereafterthat
157 is known or becomes known as an article of food under its own
158 distinctive name and which, the article is not an imitation of
159 or offered for sale under the name of another article, it
160 shall not be deemed to be misbranded if, and the name of the
161 article is accompanied on the same label or brand with a
162 statement of the place where suchthe article was manufactured
163 or produced; or.
164 (10) If the package, label, or brand fails to give the
165 ingredients or substances by their common names.
166 (11) If the food article includes an artificial
167 ingredient, but the package, label, or brand states that the
168 food article (i) contains only natural ingredients, (ii) is
Page 6

food article (i) contains only natural ingredients, (ii) is
HB172 INTRODUCED
169 all natural, and (iii) provides other words of assurance to
170 the consumer that the food article does not contain artificial
171 ingredients."
172 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
173 1, 2026.
Page 7